Maine, session 132, LD1643.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §15303, sub-§6, ¶D, as enacted by PL 1999, c. 401, Pt. AAA, §3,
is amended to read:
D. Shall coordinate its priorities with the applied research and development efforts of
the University of Maine System insofar as those efforts are in the targeted technologies
and encourage, when possible and appropriate, companies and research laboratories
receiving funds from the institute to establish joint ventures with the university system;
and
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §15303, sub-§6, ¶E, as amended by PL 2017, c. 109, §3, is further
amended to read:
E. Shall cooperate with the Department of Economic and Community Development,
the Maine Manufacturing Extension Partnership, the University of Maine System and
others in their efforts to ensure that a complementary system of support services,
including, as needed and appropriate, incubators, business assistance, technology
transfer, market research, patent research and similar services, is in place and available
to companies and research laboratories receiving funds from the institute.; and
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §15303, sub-§6, ¶F is enacted to read:
F. Shall support the Maine Life Sciences Innovation Center pursuant to section 15331.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA c. 407, sub-c. 4 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 4
MAINE LIFE SCIENCES INNOVATION CENTER
§15331. Maine Life Sciences Innovation Center
1. Establishment; purpose. The Maine Life Sciences Innovation Center, referred to
in this subchapter as "the center," is established within the institute to support life sciences
Page 1 - 132LR2061(12)

innovation, research, entrepreneurship and workforce development in the State. The center
is established to serve the following purposes:
A. To leverage and expand the State's life sciences sector by supporting collaborative
research, workforce training and entrepreneurial ventures and seeking capital
investment;
B. To advance life sciences innovation and sector research across disciplines, including
human and animal health, marine sciences, agriculture, forestry and data science;
C. To coordinate with public and private partners, educational and research institutions,
nonprofit organizations and business stakeholders to strengthen the State's innovation
efforts;
D. To investigate opportunities for grants, loans and other resources to support life
sciences entities;
E. To develop strategies to attract federal, philanthropic and private investment;
F. To advise the Maine Technology Institute Director under section 15310 on matters
related to life sciences innovation; and
G. To report regularly to the Legislature regarding the center's operations, activities
and recommendations.
2. Membership. The center is composed of 10 members. The members include:
A. The Commissioner of Economic and Community Development, or the
commissioner's designee, who serves as an ex officio, nonvoting member; and
B. Nine voting members appointed by the Governor, upon the recommendation of the
Finance Authority of Maine and the institute, with expertise spanning the life sciences
sector and its allied disciplines, including representatives of industry, life sciences
entrepreneurs, research institutions, academia, hospitals, nonprofit organizations,
investors and counties, including rural counties. Each member under this paragraph is
entitled to one vote.
The Governor shall designate a chair from among the center's members to preside at, set
the agenda for and schedule center meetings.
Center members shall disclose any direct or indirect pecuniary interest in any matter before
the center and recuse themselves from any participation in the consideration of such a
matter.
3. Operations. The following provisions govern the operations of the center.
A. The center shall meet as often as it considers necessary for the center to perform its
work.
B. To the extent practicable, the center shall conduct its work in a manner that is open
and accessible to the public.
C. The center may conduct its work through subcommittees.
4. Staff and administrative support. The institute shall provide staff as may be
necessary to fulfill the center's mission and may seek assistance from other state agencies
and private entities to accomplish the goals and work of the center.
Page 2 - 132LR2061(12)

5. Annual report. The center shall submit annually to the Governor, the Executive
Director of the Legislative Council and the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over economic development matters, no later than 120 days after the
close of the center's fiscal year, a complete report on the activities of the center. The report
must be made available to the public and must include the following for that fiscal year:
A. A description of the center's operations;
B. An accounting of the center's receipts and expenditures, assets and liabilities at the
end of its fiscal year;
C. A listing of all investments, grants, loans and incentives provided by the center
during the fiscal year;
D. A statement of the center's proposed and projected activities for the ensuing fiscal
year; and
E. Recommendations regarding further actions that may be suitable for achieving the
purposes of this subchapter.
After reviewing the report under this subsection, the joint standing committee may report
out legislation relating to the report.
Sec. 5. Maine Life Sciences Innovation Center; interim report. The Maine
Life Sciences Innovation Center established pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title
5, section 15331 shall submit an interim report to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over economic development matters no later than 180 days
after all members of the center have been appointed pursuant to Title 5, section 15331,
subsection 2. The interim report must include, but is not limited to, the following:
1. A description of the center's operations;
2. Proposed and projected activities for the ensuing fiscal year; and
3. Recommendations for future actions necessary to achieve the center's goals,
including a recommendation regarding whether the center should be changed to a quasi-
independent state entity.
After reviewing the report under this section, the joint standing committee may report
out legislation relating to the report.
Page 3 - 132LR2061(12)